Washington statutes.
RCW 26.20.080

Proof of wilfulness—Application of penalty provisions.

Proof of the nonsupport of a spouse or domestic partner or of a child or children, or the omission to furnish necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance for a spouse or domestic partner, or for a child or children, is prima facie evidence that the nonsupport or omission to furnish food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance is wilful. The provisions of RCW 26.20.030 and 26.20.035 are applicable regardless of the marital or domestic partnership status of the person who has a child dependent upon him or her, and regardless of the nonexistence of any decree requiring payment of support or maintenance.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1042; 1984 c 260 s 28; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 36; 1913 c 28 s 3; RRS s 6910. Formerly RCW 26.20.080 and 26.20.090.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.